Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-354
Policies; special fees prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any insurance company, association or society, or for any officer, manager, agent, or other representative thereof, to include in the sum charged or designated in any policy as the consideration for insurance, any fee, compensation, charge, or perquisite whatsoever, not specified in the policy. When collected the same shall be reported as such.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 69, p. 423;

R.S.1913, § 3205;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 39, p. 603;

C.S.1922, § 7804;

C.S.1929, § 44-339;

R.S.1943, § 44-354.

Premium or consideration for insurance should be designated in policy as provided herein. Machurek v. Ohio Nat. Life Ins. Co., 125 Neb. 35, 249 N.W. 81 (1933).